Mississippi, session 2026, HB1561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, from and after July 1, 2026, monies available in the Education Enhancement Fund, created pursuant to Section 27-65-75,  may be used to establish the South Mississippi Career Exploration Pilot Program. (2)  The purpose of the pilot program is to enhance college and career readiness for students enrolled in grades 6-12 by providing access to immersive, technology based career exploration and career training coursework aligned with academic instruction and regional workforce demand. (3)  Participation in the pilot program shall be limited to public school districts located in Jackson, George, and Greene Counties, and the program shall be implemented through the career coaches serving those counties. (4)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, Education Enhancement Fund monies appropriated for the pilot program shall be distributed to United Way of Jackson, George and Greene Counties, which shall administer the funds for the benefit of the career coaches serving Jackson, George, and Greene Counties. (5)  Funds awarded under this section may be used for, but are not limited to, the following purposes: (a)  Instructional technology platforms providing career exploration or career training coursework, including immersive or virtual reality based platforms such as Transfr or a substantially similar platform; (b)  Equipment, headsets, hardware, and peripherals necessary to deploy such coursework in classroom, counseling, or school based settings; (c)  Professional development and training for career coaches, teachers, counselors, and administrators supporting the pilot program; and (d)  Reasonable administrative, evaluation, and reporting costs directly related to the pilot program. (6)  United Way of Jackson, George and Greene Counties shall administer funds in compliance with applicable state laws and generally accepted accounting principles and shall ensure that funds are used solely for purposes authorized under this section. (7)  Implementation of the pilot program may include coordination with public school districts, community colleges, local employers, and other regional partners to support career pathway alignment; however, no such coordination shall be construed to require approval by any state agency as a condition of program implementation. (8)  No later than December 1, 2027, United Way of Jackson, George and Greene Counties shall submit a written report to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Education Committees detailing: (a)  Participating school districts and schools; (b)  Utilization of funds by county career coaches; (c)  Student participation levels; (d)  Observed outcomes related to student career awareness and readiness; and (e)  Recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of the pilot program. (9)  This section shall stand repealed on  July 1, 2028. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.